Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1228
Department; waive rule, regulation, or standard; when.

The department, with the approval of the board, may, whenever it deems appropriate, waive any rule, regulation, or standard relating to the licensure of emergency medical services or emergency care providers when the lack of a licensed emergency medical service in a municipality or other area will create an undue hardship in the municipality or other area in meeting the emergency medical service needs of the residents thereof.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 17;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5188;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 512;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 36.